Connecticut, session 2026, SB00348.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (1) of section 31-275 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(1) "Arising out of and in the course of his employment" means an
accidental injury happening to an employee or an occupational disease
of an employee originating while the employee has been engaged in the
line of the employee's duty in the business or affairs of the employer
upon the employer's premises, or while engaged elsewhere upon the
employer's business or affairs by the direction, express or implied, of the
employer, provided:
(A) (i) For a police officer or firefighter, "in the course of his
employment" encompasses such individual's departure from such
SB348 / File No. 352 1

SB348 File No. 352
individual's place of abode to duty, such individual's duty, and the
return to such individual's place of abode after duty;
(ii) For an employee of the Department of Correction, (I) when
responding to a direct order to appear at such employee's assignment
under circumstances in which nonessential employees are excused from
working, or (II) following two or more mandatory overtime work shifts
on consecutive days, "in the course of his employment" encompasses
such individual's departure from such individual's place of abode
directly to duty, such individual's duty, and the return directly to such
individual's place of abode after duty;
(iii) For a telecommunicator, as defined in section 28-30, (I) when a
telecommunicator is subject to emergency calls while off duty by the
terms of such telecommunicator's employment, (II) when responding to
a direct order to appear at such telecommunicator's work assignment
under circumstances in which nonessential employees are excused from
working, or (III) following two or more mandatory overtime work shifts
on consecutive days, "in the course of his employment" encompasses
such individual's departure from such individual's place of abode
directly to duty, such individual's duty, and the return directly to such
individual's place of abode after duty;
(iv) For an employee of a public works department, (I) when such
employee is subject to emergency calls while off duty by the terms of
such employee's employment, (II) when responding to a direct order to
appear at such employee's work assignment under circumstances in
which nonessential employees are excused from working, or (III)
following two or more mandatory overtime work shifts on consecutive
days, "in the course of his employment" encompasses such individual's
departure from such individual's place of abode directly to duty, such
individual's duty, and the return directly to such individual's place of
abode after duty. For purposes of this subparagraph, "public works
department" means a state or municipal department responsible for the
construction, regulation or maintenance of all things in the nature of
public works and improvements;
SB348 / File No. 352 2

SB348 File No. 352
[(iv)] (v) Notwithstanding the provisions of clauses (i) and (ii) of this
subparagraph, the dependents of any deceased employee of the
Department of Correction who was injured in the course of his
employment, as defined in this subparagraph, on or after July 1, 2000,
and who died not later than July 15, 2000, shall be paid compensation
on account of the death, in accordance with the provisions of section 31-
306, retroactively to the date of the employee's death. The cost of the
payment shall be paid by the employer or its insurance carrier which
shall be reimbursed for such cost from the Second Injury Fund as
provided in section 31-354 upon presentation of any vouchers and
information that the Treasurer may require;
(B) A personal injury shall not be deemed to arise out of the
employment unless causally traceable to the employment other than
through weakened resistance or lowered vitality;
(C) In the case of an accidental injury, a disability or a death due to
the use of alcohol or narcotic drugs shall not be construed to be a
compensable injury;
(D) For aggravation of a preexisting disease, compensation shall be
allowed only for that proportion of the disability or death due to the
aggravation of the preexisting disease as may be reasonably attributed
to the injury upon which the claim is based;
(E) A personal injury shall not be deemed to arise out of the
employment if the injury is sustained: (i) At the employee's place of
abode, and (ii) while the employee is engaged in a preliminary act or
acts in preparation for work unless such act or acts are undertaken at
the express direction or request of the employer;
(F) For purposes of subparagraph (C) of this subdivision, "narcotic
drugs" means all controlled substances, as designated by the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection pursuant to subsection (c) of
section 21a-243, but does not include drugs prescribed in the course of
medical treatment or in a program of research operated under the
direction of a physician or pharmacologist. For purposes of
SB348 / File No. 352 3

SB348 File No. 352
subparagraph (E) of this subdivision, "place of abode" includes the
inside of the residential structure, the garage, the common hallways,
stairways, driveways, walkways and the yard;
(G) The Workers' Compensation Commission shall adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to
implement the provisions of this section and shall define the terms "a
preliminary act", "acts in preparation for work", "departure from place
of abode directly to duty" and "return directly to place of abode after
duty" on or before January 1, 2006.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-275(1)
LAB Joint Favorable
SB348 / File No. 352 4

SB348 File No. 352
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Workers' Comp. Claims-Admin. App Fund - See Below See Below
Serv. Dept. Potential Cost
Note: App Fund=All Appropriated Funds
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities STATE See Below See Below
MANDATE1
- Potential
Cost
Explanation
The bill results in a potential cost to the Department of
Administrative Services – Worker’s Compensation Claims and various
self-insured municipalities beginning in FY 27 to the extent qualified
public works personnel apply for workers’ compensation benefits due
to the expanded population eligible for such benefits under the bill.
Any potential increase in the number of workers' compensation
claims resulting from this bill is not anticipated to be great enough to
result in a fiscal impact to the Workers' Compensation Commission.
State mandate is defined in Sec. 2-32b(2) of the Connecticut General Statutes, "state
mandate" means any state initiated constitutional, statutory or executive action that
requires a local government to establish, expand or modify its activities in such a way
as to necessitate additional expenditures from local revenues.
SB348 / File No. 352 5

SB348 File No. 352
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
SB348 / File No. 352 6

SB348 File No. 352
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 348
AN ACT CONCERNING PORTAL-TO-PORTAL WORKERS'
COMPENSATION COVERAGE FOR PUBLIC WORKS
DEPARTMENT EMPLOYEES.